District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
Act may be cited as the “Homeless Services Contract Adjustment Emergency Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. The Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law
18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.), is amended by adding a new section 1105a to read
as follows:
“Sec. 1105a. Equitable adjustments of homeless services contracts.
“(a)(1) Within 45 calendar days of receiving a complete request for the equitable
adjustment of a contract to provide homeless services under section 3 of the Homeless Services
Reform Act, effective October 22, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-35; D.C. Official Code § 4-754.01), on the
basis of the revision of a wage determination issued by the U.S. Department of Labor under 41
U.S.C. § 351, OCP shall determine whether the requesting contractor is entitled to an equitable
adjustment.


“(2) A request for an equitable adjustment under this subsection is “complete” when
the requesting contractor has submitted all information and documents necessary for OCP to assess
the request to OCP.
“(b) Within 7 business days of the submission to OCP of all information and documents
necessary to complete an equitable adjustment request under subsection (a), OCP shall inform the
requesting contractor in writing that it considers the request complete.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).